Massachusetts, session 194th, H3944.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The coastal zone management office within the executive office of
environmental affairs, established pursuant to section 4A of chapter 21A of the General Laws,
shall conduct a study over 3 years to assess the needs, readiness and response of the emergency
management systems for coastal communities and coastal resiliency. The study shall identify
strengths and weaknesses of state, regional and municipal readiness plans, supplies, shelters,
response assets and volunteer recruitment capabilities. The study shall identify costs for
emergency management responses, as well as mitigation, and adaption actions for coastal
resiliency improvements.
SECTION 2. Not later than June 30, 2028, the coastal zone management office shall
submit its report containing the results of the study conducted pursuant to section 1, together
with any proposed legislation, to the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate, the
of 2

joint committee on emergency preparedness and management and joint committee on
environment and natural resources.
of 2